en: Joystick Controllers
xx: Joystick Controllers
cs: Joysticky
da: Joysticks
de: Joystick Controller
es: Joysticks para videjuegos
fr: Joysticks
it: Controller joystick
ja: ジョイスティック
nl: Joysticks
no: Joysticker
pl: Joysticki
pt: Joysticks
ru: Джойстики
sv: Joystickar
tr: Kontrol Cihazları

en: Musical Instrument Game Controllers
xx: Musical Instrument Game Controllers
cs: Ovladače hudebních her
da: Musikinstrumenter til gaming
de: Gamecontroller für Musikinstrumente
es: Mandos de juegos de instrumentos musicales
fr: Contrôleurs de jeux d'instruments de musique
it: Strumenti musicali per videogiochi
ja: 楽器型ゲームコントローラー
nl: Controllers in de vorm van muziekinstrumenten
no: Instrumentkontroller for musikkspill
pl: Kontrolery do gier przypominające muzyczne instrumenty
pt: Acessórios musicais para jogos
ru: Игровые контроллеры для имитации музыкальных инструментов
sv: Spelkontroller\, musikinstrument
tr: Müzik Aleti Kontrol Cihazları

en: Gesture Control Input Devices
xx: Gesture Control Input Devices
cs: Zařízení pro ovládání gesty
da: Bevægelseskontrolenheder
de: Eingabegeräte zur Gestensteuerung
es: Dispositivos de entrada para el control por gestos
fr: Systèmes de contrôle par les gestes
it: Dispositivi di input gestuale
ja: ジェスチャ入力機器
nl: Invoerapparaten voor gebaarherkenning
no: Inndataenheter for bevegelsesstyring
pl: Urządzenia do kontroli gestami
pt: Dispositivos de entrada de controle de gestos
ru: Устройства для управжения жестами
sv: Inläsning av gester
tr: İşaret Kontrolü Giriş Cihazları

en: Graphics Tablets
xx: Graphics Tablets
cs: Grafické tablety
da: Grafiktablets
de: Grafiktabletts
es: Tabletas gráficas
fr: Tablettes graphiques
it: Tavolette grafiche
ja: ペンタブレット
nl: Grafische tablets
no: Tegnebrett
pl: Tablety graficzne
pt: Mesas gráficas digitalizadoras
ru: Графические планшеты
sv: Grafikplattor
tr: Grafik Tabletleri

en: KVM Switches
xx: KVM Switches
cs: Přepínače KVM
da: KVM-switches
de: KVM-Switches
es: Conmutadores KVM
fr: Commutateurs KVM
it: Switch KVM
ja: KVMスイッチ
nl: KVM-switches
no: KVM-svitsjer
pl: Przełączniki KVM
pt: Chaveadores KVM
ru: КВМ-переключатели
sv: KVM-switchar
tr: KVM Anahtarları

en: Keyboards
xx: Keyboards
cs: Počítačové klávesnice
da: Tastaturer
de: Tastaturen
es: Teclados
fr: Claviers
it: Tastiere per computer
ja: PCキーボード
nl: Toetsenborden
no: Tastaturer
pl: Klawiatury komputerowe
pt: Teclados para computadores
ru: Компьютерные клавиатуры
sv: Datortangentbord
tr: Klavyeler

en: Memory Card Readers
xx: Memory Card Readers
cs: Čtečky paměťových karet
da: Hukommelseskortlæsere
de: Speicherkartenlesegerät
es: Lectores de tarjetas de memoria
fr: Lecteurs de carte mémoire
it: Lettori di schede di memoria
ja: メモリカードリーダー
nl: Geheugenkaartlezers
no: Minnekortlesere
pl: Czytniki kart pamięci
pt: Leitores de cartões de memória
ru: Устройства для считывания карт памяти
sv: Minneskortläsare
tr: Bellek Kartı Okuyucuları

en: Mice & Trackballs
xx: Mice & Trackballs
cs: Myši a trackbally
da: Mus og trackballs
de: Computer Mäuse & Trackballs
es: Ratones y trackballs
fr: Souris et trackballs
it: Mouse e trackball
ja: マウス・トラックボール
nl: Muizen en trackballs
no: Mus og styrekuler
pl: Myszki i trackballe
pt: Mouses e esferas
ru: Мыши и трекболы
sv: Möss och styrkulor
tr: Fareler ve İzleme Topları

en: Numeric Keypads
xx: Numeric Keypads
cs: Numerické klávesnice
da: Taltastaturer
de: Ziffernblöcke
es: Teclados numéricos
fr: Pavés numériques
it: Tastierini numerici
ja: テンキーパッド
nl: Numerieke toetsenblokken
no: Numeriske tastaturer
pl: Klawiatury numeryczne
pt: Teclados numéricos
ru: Цифровые клавишные панели
sv: Numeriska tangentbord
tr: Numerik Tuş Takımları

en: Touchpads
xx: Touchpads
cs: Touchpady
da: Touchpads
de: Touchpads
es: Paneles táctiles
fr: Pointeurs tactiles
it: Touchpad
ja: タッチパッド
nl: Touchpads
no: Styreplater
pl: Gładziki
pt: Touchpads
ru: Сенсорные панели
sv: Styrplattor
tr: Dokunmatik Yüzeyler

en: Laptop Parts
xx: Laptop Parts
cs: Díly k notebookům
da: Bærbar computer – dele
de: Laptopteile
es: Repuestos para portátiles
fr: Composants d'ordinateur portable
it: Ricambi per laptop
ja: ノートPC用パーツ
nl: Laptoponderdelen
no: Deler til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Części do laptopów
pt: Peças para laptops
ru: Запчасти для ноутбуков
sv: Delar för bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Parçaları

en: Laptop Hinges
xx: Laptop Hinges
cs: Panty pro notebooky
da: Bærbar computer – hængsler
de: Laptop-Scharniere
es: Bisagras para portátiles
fr: Charnières pour ordinateurs portables
it: Cardini per laptop
ja: ノートPC用ヒンジ
nl: Laptopscharnieren
no: Hengsler til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Zawiasy do laptopów
pt: Dobradiças para laptops
ru: Петли для ноутбуков
sv: Gångjärn till bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Menteşeleri

en: Laptop Housings & Trim
xx: Laptop Housings & Trim
cs: Šasi notebooků
da: Bærbar computer – kabinetter
de: Laptopgehäuse
es: Carcasas de portátiles
fr: Cadres et pièces de boîtier pour ordinateurs portables
it: Custodie e involucri per laptop
ja: ノート PC用シェルケース
nl: Laptopbehuizingen en -shells
no: Kabinetter og vesker til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Obudowy do laptopów
pt: Carcaças para laptops
ru: Наклейки на ноутбуки
sv: Höljen för bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kasaları

en: Laptop Replacement Cables
xx: Laptop Replacement Cables
cs: Náhradní kabely k notebookům
da: Kabler til bærbare computere
de: Laptop-Ersatzkabel
es: Cables de repuesto para portátiles
fr: Câbles de rechange pour ordinateurs portables
it: Cavi di ricambio per computer portatile
ja: ノートPC用ケーブル
nl: Vervangende kabels voor laptops
no: Reservekabler til PC
pl: Kable do laptopów
pt: Cabos de substituição para laptops
ru: Запасные кабели для ноутбуков
sv: Reservkablar för laptops
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Kabloları

en: Laptop Replacement Keyboards
xx: Laptop Replacement Keyboards
cs: Náhradní klávesnice k notebookům
da: Bærbar computer – tastaturer
de: Laptop-Ersatztastaturen
es: Teclados de repuesto para portátiles
fr: Claviers de remplacement pour ordinateurs portables
it: Tastiere sostitutive per laptop
ja: ノートPC用キーボード
nl: Vervangende toetsenborden voor laptops
no: Tastaturer til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Zapasowe klawiatury do laptopów
pt: Teclados de reposição para laptops
ru: Сменные клавиатуры для ноутбуков
sv: Ersättningstangentbord för bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Tuş Takımları

en: Laptop Replacement Screens
xx: Laptop Replacement Screens
cs: Náhradní displeje k notebookům
da: Bærbar computer – skærme
de: Laptop-Ersatzbildschirme
es: Pantallas de repuesto para portátiles
fr: Écrans de remplacement pour ordinateurs portables
it: Schermi sostitutivi per laptop
ja: ノートPC用液晶パネル
nl: Vervangende schermen voor laptops
no: Skjermer til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Zapasowe ekrany do laptopów
pt: Monitores de reposição para laptops
ru: Сменные экраны для ноутбуков
sv: Ersättningsskärmar för bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Ekranları

en: Laptop Replacement Speakers
xx: Laptop Replacement Speakers
cs: Náhradní reproduktory k notebookům
da: Integrerbare højttalere til bærbare computere
de: Laptop-Ersatzlautsprecher
es: Altavoces de repuesto para portátiles
fr: Haut-parleurs de rechange pour ordinateurs portables
it: Altoparlanti di ricambio per computer portatile
ja: ノートPC用スピーカー
nl: Vervangende luidsprekers voor laptops
no: Reservehøyttalere til PC
pl: Zapasowe głośniki do laptopów
pt: Alto-falantes de reposição para laptops
ru: Запасные динамики для ноутбуков
sv: Ersättningshögtalare för laptops
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Hoparlörleri

en: Laptop Screen Digitizers
xx: Laptop Screen Digitizers
cs: Digitizéry na displeje notebooků
da: Digitaliseringsenheder til bærbare computere
de: Laptop-Bildschirmdigitalisierer
es: Digitalizadores para pantallas de portátiles
fr: Numériseurs à écrans d'ordinateurs portables
it: Digitalizzatori per computer portatili
ja: ノートPC用スクリーンデジタイザ
nl: Digitizers voor laptopschermen
no: Digitizere til PC-skjermer
pl: Digitizery do laptopów
pt: Digitalizadores de tela para laptops
ru: Дигитайзеры для экранов ноутбуков
sv: Digitaliserare för laptopskärmar
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Ekran Dijitalleştiricileri

en: Storage Devices
xx: Storage Devices
cs: Paměťová zařízení
da: Lagringsenheder
de: Speichergeräte
es: Dispositivos de almacenamiento
fr: Périphériques de stockage
it: Dispositivi archiviazione
ja: ストレージデバイス
nl: Opslagapparaten
no: Lagringsenheter
pl: Pamięci komputerowe
pt: Dispositivos de armazenamento
ru: Оборудование для хранения данных
sv: Lagringsenheter
tr: Depolama Aygıtları

en: Disk Duplicators
xx: Disk Duplicators
cs: Duplikátory disků
da: Diskduplikatorer
de: Datenspeicher-Duplizierer
es: Duplicadoras de disco
fr: Duplicateurs de disques
it: Duplicatori di dischi
ja: ディスクデュプリケーター
nl: Schijfduplicators
no: Diskduplikatorer
pl: Duplikatory dysków
pt: Duplicadores de disco
ru: Устройства для дублирования данных
sv: Diskduplicerare
tr: Disk Çoğaltıcılar